Utah statutes.
53A-14-104.   Sealed proposals for instructional materials contracts -- Sample copies -- Price of instructional materials.

(1)  As used in this section, the word "sealed" does not preclude acceptance of electronically sealed and submitted bids or proposals in addition to bids or proposals manually sealed and submitted.

(2)  A person seeking a contract to furnish instructional materials for use in the public schools shall submit a sealed proposal to the commission.

(3)  Each proposal must:

(a)  be accompanied by sample copies of the instructional materials to be reviewed; and

(b)  include the wholesale price at which the publisher agrees to furnish the instructional materials to districts and schools during the approval period.

